Maine, session 132, LD694.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3132, sub-§6-F is enacted to read:
6-F. High-impact electric transmission line; Land for Maine's Future. For the
commission to determine that a petition filed under this section for approval to develop a
high-impact electric transmission line is sufficient, the petition must include a provision
for an annual payment to the Land for Maine's Future Trust Fund established under Title
5, section 6203-D at a rate of $10,000 per megawatt of the high-impact electric transmission
line's nameplate capacity, of which at least 20% must be directed to the Conservation Land
Management Fund established under Title 5, section 6203-F.